Utah statutes.
38-1a-703.   Order of satisfaction if multiple liens on same property.

If liens are claimed against the same property the decree shall provide for their satisfaction in the following order:

(1)  subcontractors who are laborers or mechanics working by the day or piece, but who have not furnished materials;

(2)  all other subcontractors and all materialmen; and

(3)  original contractors.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

